Oklahoma, session 2025, SB847.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-162 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No school district or charter school in this state shall


compel an employee or volunteer to refer to a student with a pronoun


other than that which corresponds to the student’s biological sex.


For the purposes of this section, “biological sex” means the


physical condition of being male or female based on genetics and



Req. No. 48 Page 1


physiology as identified on the student’s original birth


certificate.


B. No print or nonprint materials or multimedia resources


located in a school district or charter school classroom, library,


or elsewhere on the premises of the district or charter school shall


refer to an individual by a name or by a pronoun that does not


correspond to the individual’s biological sex.


C. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules for


monitoring compliance with the provisions of this section. Upon a


finding of noncompliance by the Board, the noncompliant school


district or charter school shall receive a five percent (5%)


reduction in state funding for the fiscal year following the fiscal


year during which the district or charter school was noncompliant.


D. A parent or legal guardian of a student enrolled in and


attending a school district or charter school shall have a cause of


action against the district or charter school for noncompliance with


the provisions of subsections A and B of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-48 EB 1/19/2025 5:44:33 AM

Req. No. 48 Page 2